Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 9 Financial Structure

Cross references.

Applicability of security-registration requirements to securities issued by or guaranteed by banks or trust companies, § 10-5-8.

7-1-410.
Minimum capital stock.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the minimum capital stock of a de novo bank or trust company shall be $3 million. An established bank or trust company no longer in de novo status shall maintain a minimum capital stock of $3 million or such greater amount as the department may require based on a proportion of capital to total assets.

A de novo bank or trust company whose main office is located in a county with a population of less than 200,000, according to the last official United States census, shall have a minimum capital stock of $2 million. An established bank or trust company located in such county shall maintain a minimum capital stock of $2 million or such greater amount as the department may require based on a proportion of capital to total assets.

A bank or trust company existing on July 1, 1989, with a capital stock of less than that required by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not be required to increase its capital stock above the amount outstanding on July 1, 1989, except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2815; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 156, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-901, 109-101; Ga. L. 1935, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1901, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 18; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 5.

7-1-411.
[Reserved] Paid-in capital and appropriated retained earnings.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 9/HB 185, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 9/HB 185 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2019.

7-1-412.
[Reserved] Beginning business expense fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 10/HB 185, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 10/HB 185 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2019.

7-1-413.
Classes of shares.

A bank or trust company may have one or more classes of common or preferred shares, all of which shall be shares with par value of not less than $1.00 and any or all of which may, subject to the restrictions of this chapter, consist of shares with full, limited, multiple, fractional, or no voting rights and such designations, preferences, qualifications, privileges, limitations, redemption provisions (in the case of preferred shares), options, conversion rights, and other special rights as shall be stated in the articles. Except as otherwise stated in the articles, this chapter, or other applicable laws, each share shall be equal in all respects to every other share.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 156, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-901; Ga. L. 1935, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 7; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 958, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1904, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-414.
Purchase, redemption, and convertibility of shares and debt securities.

Any preferred shares subject to redemption shall be redeemable only pro rata or by lot or by such other equitable method as is selected by the board of directors, except as otherwise provided in the articles.

With the written approval of the department and the votes of directors and shareholders required to authorize an increase in the capital stock of the institution under Code Section 7-1-511:

Preferred stock may be convertible to common stock; and

Subordinated securities may be convertible to common stock.

With the written approval of the department and a resolution of the board of directors, a bank or trust company may acquire issued shares of its own common stock, which will then be considered treasury shares. The department shall consider whether the acquisition has a legitimate corporate purpose, whether any capital impairment would result, and whether the price of the shares reflects fair market value.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 958, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1905, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 8; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 7/HB 780.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, substituted “department and a resolution of the board of directors,” for “department, a resolution of the board of directors, and a two-thirds’ affirmative vote of the shares entitled to vote,” in the first sentence of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-415.
Consideration for shares.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and in the case of a distribution of shares under subsection (e) of Code Section 7-1-488 or incident to a merger, consolidation, or other corporate reorganization or rehabilitation authorized by this chapter, shares of a bank or trust company may be issued only for cash in an amount which shall be at least the aggregate par value of the share, unless otherwise approved by the department with the demonstration of good cause.

Where a bank or trust company issues shares in exchange for or in order to convert other shares or obligations which have been issued by it, the consideration for such shares shall be:

The cash originally received for the shares or obligations surrendered or converted;

The additional cash received incident to the exchange or conversion;

The other amounts, if any, transferred to capital stock incident to the exchange or conversion.

In any such case the consideration shall be not less than the minimum amount specified in subsection (a) of this Code section. Any amount by which capital stock may be reduced upon an exchange or conversion shall be transferred to paid-in capital.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2815; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, § 7; Code 1933, §§ 13-908, 109-101; Ga. L. 1963, p. 511, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 14; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 958, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 384, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1906, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 795, § 1/HB 945; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 11/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “, plus such amounts, if any, necessary to assure that after issuance of the shares the bank or trust company will have the paid-in capital required by Code Section 7-1-411 and, in the case of a new bank or trust company, the expense fund required by Code Section 7-1-396” following “good cause” at the end of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on business corporations, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2012).

7-1-416.
Method of issuance.

Unless more restrictive procedures are stated in the articles, the board of directors may, by resolution duly adopted, issue from time to time, in whole or in part, common or preferred shares authorized by the articles.

With the consent of the department, a bank or trust company may withdraw any offer to sell its common or preferred shares, whether issued pursuant to its articles or pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section; and such shares may be held as authorized shares subject to future issuance in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section.

A bank or trust company may not, directly or indirectly, extend credit for the purpose of financing the original purchase of capital stock or capital debt issued by it or by a bank holding company to which it is affiliated.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 958, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1907, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 11; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 16.

7-1-417.
Share certificates and debt security instruments.

A bank or trust company shall not deliver any share certificate until the share or shares represented thereby are fully paid. Each subscriber, upon payment in full for his shares, shall be entitled to a certificate or certificates certifying the number of shares owned by him in the bank or trust company.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or the bylaws, the shares of a bank or trust company shall be represented by certificates signed by the president or a vice-president and the secretary or an assistant secretary of the bank or trust company and may be sealed with the seal of the bank or trust company or a facsimile thereof. The signatures of such officers upon a certificate may be facsimiles if the certificate is countersigned by a transfer agent, or registered by a registrar, other than the bank or trust company itself or any employee of the bank or trust company.

Each certificate representing shares shall set forth upon the face thereof:

The name of the bank or trust company;

That the bank or trust company is organized under the laws of this state;

The name or names of the person or persons to whom issued;

The number and class of shares such certificate represents;

The par value of each share represented by such certificate;

If the shares represented thereby are nonvoting shares, a statement or notation to that effect; and

If the shares represented thereby are subordinate to shares of any other class with respect to dividends or amounts payable on liquidation, a brief statement to that effect.

Each certificate representing shares issued by a bank or trust company which is authorized to issue shares of more than one class shall set forth or fairly summarize upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the bank or trust company will furnish to any shareholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of the shares of each class authorized to be issued.

In the event of a change in the capital structure of a corporation, it shall not be necessary to recall any previously issued share certificate for either the addition or deletion of the statement required by paragraph (7) of subsection (c) of this Code section to be set forth upon the face of such certificate or for revision of the information placed upon the face or back of the certificate pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section.

The signatures of the officers of a bank or trust company and the seal of the bank or trust company upon any bond, debenture, or other debt security issued by the bank or trust company may be facsimiles if the instrument is authenticated or countersigned by a trustee or transfer agent, or registered by a registrar, other than the bank or trust company itself or any employee of the bank or trust company.

In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a share certificate or upon a bond, debenture, or other debt security as provided in this Code section shall have ceased for any reason to be such officer before such certificate or instrument is issued, it may be issued by the bank or trust company with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of its issue.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to invalidate any share certificate validly issued and outstanding on April 1, 1975.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1908, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7.

7-1-418.
Issuance and transfer of fractional shares or scrip.

A bank or trust company may, but shall not be obliged to, issue certificates for fractional shares in order to effect share transfers, share distributions or reclassifications, mergers, consolidations, or reorganizations which shall entitle the holder, in proportion to his fractional holdings, to exercise voting rights, to receive dividends thereon, and to participate in any of the assets of the bank or trust company in the event of liquidation.

As an alternative, a bank or trust company may pay in cash the fair value of fractional shares as determined by the board of directors as of a time fixed by the board. In the absence of bad faith, all acts of the board pursuant to this subsection shall be conclusive.

As an alternative, the board of directors may issue scrip in registered or bearer form over the manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the bank or trust company or of its agent, exchangeable as therein provided for full shares; but such scrip shall not entitle the holder to any rights of a shareholder except as therein provided. The board of directors may cause such scrip to be issued subject to the condition that it shall become void if not exchanged for certificates representing full shares before a specified date, or subject to the condition that the shares for which such scrip is exchangeable may be sold by the bank or trust company and the proceeds thereof distributed to the holders of such scrip, or subject to any other conditions which the board of directors may deem advisable. If a bank or trust company issues scrip, it shall provide reasonable opportunity for persons entitled thereto to sell such scrip or to purchase such additional scrip as may be needed to acquire a full share.

A corporation may provide reasonable opportunity for persons entitled to fractional shares to sell such fractional shares or to purchase such additional fractional shares as may be needed to acquire a full share, or may sell fractional shares or scrip for the account of such persons.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1909, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-419.
Subordinated securities.

A bank or trust company may issue notes, debentures, or other obligations in the form of “subordinated securities,” provided that they:

Are subordinated in right of payment, in the event of insolvency or liquidation of the bank or trust company, to the prior payment of all deposits of the bank or trust company and of all claims of other creditors of the bank or trust company except the holders of securities on a parity therewith and the holders of securities expressly subordinated thereto;

Are authorized by the same votes of directors as those required for authorization of an increase in capital stock or any instrument convertible into capital stock of the bank or trust company;

Contain provisions for amortization, serial maturities, transfers to a sinking fund, allocation of reserves, or other provisions sufficient to pay or to have paid at maturity all amounts due thereon;

Furnish disclosures to investors of the risks associated with the subordinated securities prior to investment; and

Include notice that, if the bank or trust company becomes subject to a regulatory action, then the bank or trust company may be prohibited from paying or retiring the subordinated securities.

The aggregate amount of the obligations of a bank or trust company in the form of subordinated securities shall at no time exceed 50 percent of the sum of the unimpaired capital stock and unimpaired paid-in capital of the bank or the trust company.

If at or after the payment or retirement of the subordinated securities of a bank or trust company there is or would be a deficiency in the capital stock of the bank or trust company, such fact shall be reported to the department in advance of the payment or retirement. The department may, upon receipt of such report, order a restoration of capital stock or take other appropriate remedial measures under this chapter.

Subordinated securities shall not be considered in determining the amount of ad valorem taxes payable by the bank or trust company.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-2025.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1965, p. 494, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, §§ 6, 7; Code 1933, § 41A-1910, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 11/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 12/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “capital stock and unimpaired paid-in capital” for “capital stock, unimpaired paid-in capital, and appropriated retained earnings” near the end of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Order of payment of liabilities of financial institution which is liquidated or dissolved and whose assets are insufficient to pay in full all liabilities, §

7-1-202

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Borrowed money, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-9.